Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-106
Shelterbelts; agreements; contents; recording.

Every such agreement shall describe particularly the land to be covered by the shelterbelt, and shall be recorded in the county where such land is situated; and, thereafter, all leases, sales, and other disposition of such land shall be subject to such agreement.

Laws 1935, c. 144, § 2, p. 538;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-109;

R.S.1943, § 72-106.